Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB411.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 29, 2012 (P.L.549, No.54), known as the Stroke System of Care Act, is amended by adding a section to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 2 OF THE ACT OF MAY 29, 2012 (P.L.549, NO.54), KNOWN AS THE STROKE SYSTEM OF CARE ACT, IS AMENDED BY ADDING A DEFINITION TO READ:SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ACT SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:<--<--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920 * * *"THROMBECTOMY-CAPABLE STROKE CENTER." A FACILITY WHICH IS DESIGNATED AS A THROMBECTOMY-CAPABLE STROKE CENTER BY THE JOINT COMMISSION OR A NONGOVERNMENTAL ORGANIZATION THAT HAS BEEN AUTHORIZED BY THE CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND MEDICAID SERVICES (CMS) TO CONDUCT HOSPITAL SURVEYS TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH THE CMS CONDITIONS OF PARTICIPATION.SECTION 2. SECTION 5(A) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 5. BIENNIAL REPORT.(A) DUTY TO PREPARE AND FILE.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PREPARE A BIENNIAL REPORT BY JULY 1 IN ODD-NUMBERED YEARS IN CONJUNCTION WITH ITS REVIEW OF EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES PROTOCOLS. THE REPORT SHALL BE FILED WITH THE CHAIRMAN AND MINORITY CHAIRMAN OF THE [PUBLIC HEALTH AND WELFARE] HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE CHAIRMAN AND MINORITY CHAIRMAN OF THE HEALTH COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.* * *SECTION 3. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:Section 5.1. Statewide stroke registry.(a) Registry formation.--The department shall ensure access to a Statewide stroke registry and REGISTRY. THE DEPARTMENT may contract with a nationally recognized, evidence-based organization for the utilization of the organization's stroke care program data set in effect as of the effective date of this subsection for the formation of a Statewide stroke registry to REGISTRY. THE STATEWIDE STROKE REGISTRY SHALL be published on the department's publicly accessible Internet website that includes AND INCLUDE information and data on stroke care in this Commonwealth that COMMONWEALTH. DATA AND INFORMATION SHALL align with the stroke consensus metrics developed and approved by a 20250SB0411PN0944 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nationally recognized, evidence-based organization in effect as of the effective date of this subsection. The department shall update the registry on a biannual basis in accordance with the submission of data as required in subsection (b).(b) Data submission.--On and after January 1, 2026, or 180 days after the effective date of this subsection, whichever is later, each comprehensive stroke center, thrombectomy-capable stroke center, primary stroke center and acute stroke-ready hospital shall, on a biannual basis, submit data to the department concerning stroke care for inclusion in the Statewide stroke registry, as determined by the Secretary of Health. Data under this subsection shall align with the stroke consensus metrics developed and approved by the American Heart Association A NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED, EVIDENCE-BASED ORGANIZATION in effect as of the effective date of this subsection . (c) Data access.--Each comprehensive stroke center, thrombectomy-capable stroke center, primary stroke center and acute stroke-ready hospital shall provide the department with access to records, as the department deems necessary to perform case findings or other quality improvement audits to ensure completeness of reporting and data accuracy consistent with the purposes of this section.(d) Contract and reporting.--The department may enter a contract with a nationally recognized, evidence-based organization for the receipt, storage, holding, updating or maintenance of the data or files under department control and management. The department may enter into reciprocal reporting agreements with the appropriate agencies of other states to exchange stroke care data.(E) CONFIDENTIALITY.--20250SB0411PN0944 - 3 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) DATA SUBMITTED AND MADE ACCESSIBLE UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT CONTAIN CONFIDENTIAL OR PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION OF ANY INDIVIDUAL.(2) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE THE DISCLOSURE OF CONFIDENTIAL OR PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION OF AN INDIVIDUAL.Section 2 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0411PN0944 - 4 - <--1234567